Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.414

Auditing services revolving account—Disbursements.

Disbursements from the auditing services revolving account shall be made pursuant to vouchers executed by the state auditor or his or her designee in accordance with RCW 43.09.412.

[ 1995 c 301 s 27; 1981 c 336 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 336: See note following RCW 43.09.410.